Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Statewide Emergency Medical Care System.

§§ 32.1-112 through 32.1-116.01.
Repealed by Acts 1996, c. 899.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 192, cl. 1, enacted a new section, § 32.1-112.2, which falls within the span of sections repealed by Acts 1996, c. 899. At the direction of the Code Commission, this enactment has been recodified as §

32.1-111.16

, and added as a new Article 2.2 of Chapter 4 of this title, following the span of sections enacted by Acts 1996, c. 899.

Acts 1996, c. 998, cl. 1, enacted a new section, § 32.1-114.1, which falls within the span of sections repealed by Acts 1996, c. 899. At the direction of the Code Commission, this enactment has been recodified as §

32.1-111.12:01

, and placed within the span of new sections enacted by Acts 1996, c. 899.

Acts 1996, c. 1017, cl. 1, amended § 32.1-114, which was repealed by Acts 1996, c. 899, cl. 2. At the direction of the Code Commission, the amendment was implemented in former §

32.1-111.10

.

Section 32.1-112.1 was previously repealed by Acts 1984, c. 493.